Washington statutes.
RCW 18.320.005

Findings—2011 c 89.

(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The practice of social work by persons in the public and private sectors improves the lives of many people throughout the state through the application of a broad spectrum of social sciences to enhance the quality of life and develop the full potential of each client;

(b) The practice of social work is a complex discipline that, appropriately undertaken, can address client problems, needs, and concerns, with the goal that clients achieve the maximum possible enhancement of their quality of life and develop to their full potential. However, improper assessment of client problems and needs by unqualified persons can lead to client harm;

(c) It is in the state's interest to take steps to safeguard state residents from misrepresentations about qualifications for practicing social work. Because such misrepresentations could lead to the improper practice of social work by unqualified persons, those who represent themselves as social workers should have a qualifying degree from an accredited and approved social work program.

(2) The legislature declares that chapter 89, Laws of 2011 to regulate social workers constitutes an exercise of the state's police power to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state in general. Accordingly, while chapter 89, Laws of 2011 is intended to protect the public generally, it does not create a duty owed by the state or its instrumentalities to any individual or entity.

[ 2011 c 89 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 89: "This act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 c 89 s 21.]